Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-220.01
Violation; nuisance; abatement or other relief.

A violation of the Barber Act by any person shall constitute a nuisance and the board, acting in the name of the state, shall be authorized to file suit in the district court of the district in which the alleged violation occurred for the purpose of seeking an abatement of such nuisance and for such other relief as the court may deem appropriate to grant. The procedure in the district court shall be the same as the procedure for matters in equity in the district court of Nebraska.

Laws 1971, LB 1020, § 24;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 94.